District of Columbia statutes.
1-325.42

Budget submission requirements.

(a)

The Mayor shall submit to the Council, as part of the annual budget, a requested appropriation of local funds for the Schools Modernization Fund, including a description of estimated expenditures.

(b)

The appropriation of local funds to, or the existence of retained funds in, the Schools Modernization Fund shall not replace local funding that otherwise would be directed to the capital budget for the District of Columbia Public Schools.

Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 4043, 52 DCR 7503

History

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4043 of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).

Emergency Legislation